Wisconsin, session 2025, SB446.
do enact as follows:SB446,11Section 1. 16.195 of the statutes is created to read:SB446,2,6216.195 Immigration-related civil legal services grants. (1) From the 3appropriation under s. 20.505 (1) (ek), the department shall award grants to 4community-based organizations and other organizations, whether or not operated 5for profit, based in this state for the provision of civil legal services to individuals 6and families in matters related to immigration.SB446,2,87(2) (a) The department shall establish an accessible and equitable application 8process for the award of grants under sub. (1).SB446,2,129(b) Before awarding each grant, the department shall determine that the 10grant applicant has a record of providing civil legal services to individuals and 11families in matters related to immigration and that the applicant provides such 12services without regard to the client’s immigration status.SB446,213Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 14insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB446,220Section 2. 20.505 (1) (ek) of the statutes is created to read:SB446,3,4120.505 (1) (ek) Immigration-related civil legal services grants. As a continuing 2appropriation, the amounts in the schedule to provide grants under s. 16.195 for the 3provision of civil legal services to individuals and families in immigration-related 4matters.SB446,35Section 3. 59.53 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 59.53 (3) (intro.) and 6amended to read:SB446,3,8759.53 (3) Community action and nonprofit agencies. (intro.) The board 8may appropriate funds for promoting any of the following purposes:SB446,3,109(a) Promoting and assisting any community action agency under s. 49.265, 10and for making.SB446,3,1511(b) Making payments to a nonprofit organization, as defined in s. 23.197 (4) 12(a) 1., that has as a primary purpose providing assistance to individuals who are 13the victims of domestic violence and related crimes. The county may also 14appropriate money for making payments to such a nonprofit organization for its 15capital and operational expenses.SB446,416Section 4. 59.53 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB446,3,191759.53 (3) (c) Making payments to community-based organizations and other 18organizations, whether or not operated for profit, based in this state for the 19provision of civil legal services to individuals and families.SB446,3,2020